Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4848.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1509. (1) The department shall provide to school
districts, intermediate school districts, public school academies,
and nonpublic schools a notice containing information regarding
section 213b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.213b.
The notice from the department must contain information about the
requirements of this section, a copy of or a link to section 213b
of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.213b, and contact
information for the office of school safety within the department
of state police for questions about section 213b of the Michigan
CRM H00693'25 (H-1) ed1syc


penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.213b. The department is not liable
in a civil action that arises out of the notice provided in this
subsection.
(2) School districts, intermediate school districts, public
school academies, and nonpublic schools shall post the notice
described in subsection (1) on the homepage of the school
district's, intermediate school district's, public school academy's
or nonpublic school's website.
(3) The board of a school district or intermediate school
district, board of directors of a public school academy, or board
of a nonpublic school shall implement a policy to educate the
individuals described in subsection (4)(a) about section 213b of
the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.213b.
(4) The board of a school district or intermediate school
district, board of directors of a public school academy, or board
of a nonpublic school shall electronically provide free educational
materials on sextortion from the National Center for Missing and
Exploited Children, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or the
Office for Victims of Crime. All of the following apply to the free
educational materials on sextortion electronically provided under
this subsection:
(a) The board of a school district or intermediate school
district, board of directors of a public school academy, or board
of a nonpublic school shall electronically provide the free
educational materials on sextortion to all of the following
individuals:
(i) School personnel employed by or at a school operated by the
school district, intermediate school district, public school
academy, or nonpublic school.
CRM H00693'25 (H-1) ed1syc


(ii) Students who are in any of grades 6 to 12 and who are
enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district,
public school academy, or nonpublic school.
(iii) Parents and legal guardians of the students described in
subparagraph (ii).
(b) For the board of a school district or intermediate school
district or board of directors of a public school academy, the free
educational materials on sextortion must be electronically provided
to individuals described in subdivision (a) after a meeting of the
board or board of directors in which the educational materials were
discussed and shared publicly.
(c) For the board of a nonpublic school, the free educational
materials on sextortion must be electronically provided to
individuals described in subdivision (a) after a meeting of the
board in which the educational materials were discussed and shared
publicly or at least 1 time per school year if a meeting described
in this subdivision is not held.
(5) When electronically providing the educational materials on
sextortion under subsection (4), the board of a school district or
intermediate school district, board of directors of a public school
academy, or board of a nonpublic school shall include a link to the
notice described in subsection (1).
(6) As used in this section, "sextortion" means a form of
child sexual exploitation in which an individual threatens another
individual who is less than 18 years of age with the possibility of
sharing a nude or sexual image of the individual who is less than
18 years of age with the public and demands additional sexual
content, sexual activity, or money from the individual who is less
than 18 years of age.
Final Page
CRM H00693'25 (H-1) ed1syc